Hawaii statutes.
[§342H-53] Applicability and
requirements. (a) The provisions of this part do not apply to municipal
solid waste landfill units that do not receive wastes after October 9,
1991.

(b) Municipal solid waste landfill units that
receive waste after October 9, 1991, but stop receiving waste before
October 9, 1993, are exempt from the requirements of this part except the
final cover requirement prescribed by rules adopted pursuant to this part. The
final cover shall be installed within six months of the last receipt of
wastes. Owners and operators of municipal solid waste landfill units subject
to this subsection that fail to complete cover installation within six months
from the date of the last receipt of wastes shall be subject to all the
requirements of this part, and rules adopted pursuant to this part, subject to
such exemptions as may be provided by those rules.

(c) The provisions of this part apply to
owners and operators of new municipal solid waste landfill units, existing
municipal solid waste landfill units, and lateral expansions, except as
otherwise provided in this part or otherwise exempted by rules adopted pursuant
to this part.

(d) Following closure of a municipal solid
waste landfill unit, or a component of a municipal solid waste landfill unit,
the owner or operator of the unit shall conduct post-closure care for a period
of thirty years. The director may increase the length of the post-closure care
period if the director determines that the lengthened period is necessary to
protect human health and the environment. The director may decrease the length
of the post-closure care period if the owner or operator of the closed
municipal solid waste landfill unit demonstrates to the satisfaction of the
director that the reduced period is sufficient to protect human health and the
environment.

(e) Owners and operators of municipal solid
waste landfill units that receive waste on or after October 9, 1993, shall
comply with the financial assurance criteria that the director shall establish
by rules adopted pursuant to this part. Such rules shall be effective no later
than April 9, 1994.

(f) Municipal solid waste landfill units
containing sewage sludge shall comply with the provisions of this part and the
rules adopted pursuant to this part.

(g) In addition to compliance with the
provisions of this part and rules adopted pursuant to this part, owners and
operators of a municipal solid waste landfill unit shall comply with any other
applicable state and federal law. [L 1992, c 245, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next